South Dakota, session 2026, HB1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-25-25 be AMENDED:
22-25-25. The game, bingo, as defined in § 22-25-23, or lottery, as defined in
§ 22-25-24, may not be construed as gambling or as a lottery within the meaning of § 22-
25-1, if:
(1) The bingo game or lottery is conducted by a:
(a) Bona fide congressionally chartered veterans' organization;
(b) Religious, charitable, educational, or fraternal organization;
(c) Local civic, service, or booster club;
(d) Political party;
(e) Volunteer fire department;
(f) Local industrial development corporation as defined in § 5-14-23; or
(g) Political action committee or political committee on behalf of any candidate
for a political office, which exists under the laws of this state;
(2) The proceeds therefrom do not directly benefit any individual;
(3) No separate organization or professional person is employed to conduct the bingo
game or lottery, or assist therein, except as provided in § 22-25-41;
(4) No compensation of any kind in excess of the state minimum wage per hour or
sixty dollars, whichever is greater, is paid to any person for services rendered
during any bingo session in connection with the conduct of the bingo game or in
consideration of any lottery. The provisions of this subdivision do not apply to
games or lotteries conducted in connection with:
(a) A county fair conducted pursuant to § 7-27-3;
(b) The state fair conducted pursuant to chapter 1-21; or

26.474.25 2 1201
(c) A civic celebration recognized by resolution or other similar official action of
the governing body of a county, municipality, or village;
(5) No prize in excess of two thousand dollars is awarded at any one play of bingo;
(6) The actual value of any lottery prize is stated before any chances for the lottery are
sold. A lottery prize of a stated amount of dollars in value may be given to a person
who sells a winning lottery ticket or share as long as the winning lottery ticket or
share is selected at random;
(7) The organizations authorized under subdivision (1) of this section, before
conducting a bingo game or before selling any chances for a lottery, give thirty
days' written notice of the time and place thereof to the governing body or
designated administrative official of the county or municipality in which it intends
to conduct the bingo game or lottery, and the governing body does not pass a
resolution objecting thereto. Any organization that conducts a lottery and sells
tickets or shares for the lottery state-wide shall provide written notice of the lottery
pursuant to this subdivision only to the secretary of state and to the governing
body where the drawing for the lottery is held. A municipality pursuant to § 9-29-
5 may by ordinance prohibit within the municipality the sale of lottery tickets or
shares for the lottery issued pursuant to this section; and
(8) No organization authorized to conduct a bingo game or lottery under subdivision
(1) of this section enters into any lease or agreement with any other person or
organization to provide equipment or services associated with the conduct of a
bingo game or lottery. This subdivision does not apply to any device provided under
§ 22-25-41, or to any lease or agreement with a distributor to provide bingo or
lottery equipment and supplies.
Section 2. That § 22-25-41 be AMENDED:
22-25-41. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no coin-operated machine
or mechanical pull-tab dispensing device may be sold or otherwise furnished to any
organization in this state by a distributor or manufacturer.
A distributor or manufacturer may sell or furnish a coin or bill operated mechanical
pull-tab dispensing device if the device is only sold or furnished to and only used by a:
(1) Fraternal or charitable organization;
(2) Local civic, service, or booster club;
(3) Volunteer fire department; or
HB1201 ENROLLED

26.474.25 3 1201
(4) Congressionally chartered veteran's organization that qualifies under § 22-25-
25.1.
A device sold or furnished under this section may be used at an establishment
licensed pursuant to subdivision 35-4-2(4), (6), (12), or (16) that is not owned or
operated by the person authorized to purchase the device. Each person authorized to
purchase the device is limited to placing one device in no more than two establishments
that are not owned or operated by the person. No establishment may have more than one
device placed within it. All proceeds from the operation of the device must be retained by
the person authorized to purchase the device.
HB1201 ENROLLED

26.474.25 4 1201
An Act to authorize the use of bingo games, lotteries, and pull-tab devices by booster clubs.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1201
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1201 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1201 ENROLLED